California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(b) (1) (A) For purposes of this section, to the extent possible, all providers employed by the voluntary nonprofit or proprietary agency shall be persons previously listed on the public authority’s registry. The agency shall, pursuant to the contract, continually recruit and provide the public authority with names of new workers for the registry.

(B) The voluntary nonprofit or proprietary agency in each participating county shall provide for training for all providers recruited pursuant to this paragraph. A public authority may retain the voluntary nonprofit or proprietary agency to provide these services for and under the direction of the public authority. A public authority shall not be eligible to receive reimbursement for any costs associated with administering the pilot
 project. This shall not prohibit any public authority from using the funding it receives pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) for newsletters and other means of communication about training opportunities available through the voluntary nonprofit or proprietary agency.

(C) All providers employed by the voluntary nonprofit or proprietary agency shall be paid no less than the wages and benefits provided for in the public authority’s collective bargaining agreement, provided that this provision shall not obligate the state to participate in a contract rate higher than the maximum allowable contract rate. However, providers employed by the voluntary nonprofit or proprietary agency are not covered by any existing collective bargaining agreements with the public authority.

(2) A voluntary nonprofit or proprietary agency that contracts with a participating county pursuant to
 subdivision (a) shall perform all of the following duties:

(A) Maintain a live, on-call emergency service response system that is available 24 hours a day, seven days a week.

(B) Replace or supplement providers for a recipient who needs immediate service for the sake of preserving his or her health or safety within two hours of notification.

(C) To the extent possible, employ the recipient’s preferred provider or providers.

(D) If required by the county, provide emergency backup services to severely impaired IHSS recipients when there is an unexpected interruption in services.

(E) Maintain a list of its providers with the public authority.

(F) Establish and maintain an upskilling program, based on practices in existing agency contracts, wherein employees may have the opportunity to use work experience and training toward upward movement on a long-term care career ladder. Any costs associated with the development and maintenance of the upskilling program shall be paid solely by the voluntary nonprofit or proprietary agency.

(G) Be liable for any fraud, waste, or abuse for which it is responsible.

(3) For the duration of the pilot project, supportive services not provided in any month due to hospitalization, illness, refusal, or other cause not within the control of the provider shall not be made up in a subsequent period without caseworker approval.

(c) (1) In each
 participating county, the IHSS advisory committee, as described in Section 12301.3, shall monitor the pilot program.

(2) Each participating county shall not be eligible to receive state reimbursement of administrative costs associated with monitoring the pilot program. Any administrative costs incurred by a public authority for monitoring the pilot project shall be paid to the public authority pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a). Any advisory committee expenses incurred as a result of this pilot project, if determined to be reimbursable to the county, shall be reimbursed with the current advisory committee allocation.

(3) Each county pilot project shall continue for four years, provided that if a county takes action to terminate a contract for cause, as defined in the contract, it may then terminate its participation in the pilot project. By the end of the third year,
 each participating county shall provide for an independent evaluation to assess the success of the pilot program, based on all of the following criteria:

(A) Consumer satisfaction.

(B) Cost-effectiveness.

(C) Average turnover of providers.

(D) The effect of the pilot project on non-IHSS vendors, workers, and referral agencies.

(E) Worker satisfaction.

(F) The extent to which counties identify, refer to, and work with appropriate agencies in investigation, administrative action, or prosecution of instances of fraud, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 12305.8, in the provision of supportive services.

(d) All costs associated with the independent evaluation shall be paid solely by the voluntary nonprofit or proprietary agency.

(e) The independent evaluation shall be sent directly to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature.

(f) County social workers shall continue to establish eligibility, needs, and frequency of service and serve as recipient advocates, as appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 196.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

12316.

(a) The City and County of San Francisco may implement a pilot project of not less than three years’ duration to implement the provision of pooled services under this article through a modified delivery system in no more than five HUD-subsidized senior housing facilities owned by nonprofit organizations. If the department deems that a waiver of statutes or regulations is necessary, the pilot project shall be operated in accordance with that waiver. The purpose of the pilot project shall be to improve consumer satisfaction with in-home supportive
 services.

(b) (1) A pool of providers shall be selected by consumers, site staff, and the county to provide in-home supportive services under the pilot project consistent with the county’s uniform assessment of needs as specified in Section 12309.

(2) Authorized nonmedical personal services shall be provided under the pilot project by providers in the pool at the times and frequency appropriate to meet each consumer’s need intermittently throughout the course of the day.

(3) A memorandum of understanding between the county and the specific sites shall be signed before the project begins.

(c) (1) Consumers shall sign a disclosure form that explains the consumer’s rights and responsibilities as an indication of
 their election to participate in the pilot project.

(2) Consumers who live in designated senior housing projects shall be offered the option of being serviced by the pilot project. These consumers shall have the option to change that decision at any time.

(d) As a separate consumer option under the pilot project, designated related services shall be provided for several consumers simultaneously.

(e) The county shall monitor the provision of services under the pilot project to ensure that the level and quality of services provided through the pilot project is at least at the same level that would have been provided under the nonpilot project individual provider service delivery as provided in Section 12302.

(f) (1) The department
 shall, in conjunction with the county, develop a provider timesheet and daily log to track the work performed by providers under the pilot project to ensure appropriate provider payment and to track the work provided for each consumer back to the consumer’s authorization.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that provider payment be issued by the state’s Case Management Information and Payroll System (CMIPS) to each provider who provides services pursuant to the pilot project.

(g) At the end of three years, the county shall evaluate the success of the pilot project implemented under this section. If the pilot project is successful, the department shall, at the county’s request, extend the pilot project for an additional two years. The success of the pilot project shall be evaluated based on the following factors:

(1) Consumer satisfaction.

(2) Cost effectiveness.

(3) Average turnover of providers.

(h) In evaluating the project, the county shall ensure all of the following:

(1) An independent, impartial, outside evaluator or a county employee independent of the project shall be used.

(2) If the county decides to employ an outside evaluator, the county shall be responsible for all costs associated with the evaluation.

(3) The department shall approve the evaluation design and plan.

(4) Quarterly progress reports shall be completed.

(5) If a federal waiver is required, the county shall follow federal waiver evaluation criteria requirements.

(i) The department may waive the enforcement of specific statutory requirements, regulations, and standards in the county by formal order of the director pursuant to Section 18204.

(j) The department, in coordination with the Director of Health Services, shall seek any federal waivers or approvals necessary for continued funding of the Personal Care Services Program (PCSP) pursuant to Section 14132.95 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The State Department of Health Services shall have 30 days from the date of request by the county to make a determination of the need to seek federal approval and, if the department deems the approval to be necessary, to formally request the approval. The implementation of the
 pilot project shall occur after any necessary federal waivers or approvals are obtained.

(k) The pilot project shall be cost-neutral to the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 479, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

12316.1.

(a) (1) The department shall administer the Career Pathways Program for providers of in-home supportive services under this article, or Section 14132.95, 14132.952, or 14132.956, or waiver personal care services under Section 14132.97, to increase the quality of care, recruitment and retention of providers for recipients and to provide training opportunities for career advancement in the home care and health care industries. Providers who have completed provider enrollment but who may not currently be providing services to a recipient, and are eligible to work for a recipient, including registry and emergency backup providers, may participate in the Career Pathways Program.

(2) The objectives of the career pathways include, but are not
 limited to, all of the following:

(A) Promotion of recipient self-determination principles.

(B) Dignity in providing and receiving care through meaningful collaboration between the recipient and provider.

(C) Advancement of health and service equity, including the quality of care, care outcomes, and life.

(D) Promotion of a culturally and linguistically competent workforce to serve the growing racial, ethnic, and linguistic diversity of an aging population.

(E) Increase in both provider employment retention and recruitment of new providers to maintain a stable workforce for recipients.

(3) Each career pathway shall include
 multiple courses of related curriculum on a given topic. Five career pathways shall be offered, including all of the following:

(A) The basic skills career pathways are (i) general health and safety and (ii) adult education topics.

(B) The specialized skills career pathways are (i) cognitive impairments and behavioral health, (ii) complex physical care needs, and (iii) transitioning to home and community-based living from out-of-home care or homelessness.

(b) In administering this section, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Review and approve proposed training curriculum that is consistent with the requirements of subdivision (a).

(2) Upon completion of a competitive
 process, enter into agreements with multiple qualified third-party entities that the department deems qualified to provide training as approved pursuant to subparagraph (1).

(3) Determine the methodology and distribution of appropriated funds pursuant to this section.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section, “qualified third-party entity” means a county, public authority, or nonprofit consortium as defined in Section 12301.6, a nonprofit entity that is tax exempt pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, or a Taft-Hartley Labor Management Partnership. For-profit entities are strictly excluded from this definition.

(2) A qualified third-party entity shall have both of the following:

(A) Experience in training in
 person or online, using live instructor-led sessions or self-paced learning modules, which include a competency-based curriculum that is grounded in adult educational principles and that supports multiple languages wherever possible.

(B) The capacity to recruit and enroll providers electronically, in person, or both.

(d) Provider participation in the training described in subdivision (a) shall be voluntary, and the training shall be offered at no cost to providers. Providers shall be compensated for each hour of training at a rate equivalent to the county’s hourly negotiated wage rate for in-home supportive services providers. Counties and public authorities shall not be required to provide any funding for compensation to providers for training provided pursuant to this section.

(e) To the extent possible, career
 pathways may include curriculum that promotes retention of providers or that meets licensing and certification course requirements to assist providers in achieving their identified career advancement in the home care and health care industries.

(f) A provider shall be eligible to receive an incentive payment or multiple incentive payments, with an incentive payment available for each of the individual activities specified in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive. The amounts of the incentive payments shall be determined by the department, in collaboration with the employer representative unions, county human services agencies and their representatives, public authorities or nonprofit consortia as defined in Section 12301.6, and other relevant stakeholders. The individual activities eligible for incentive payments pursuant to this subdivision include all of the following:

(1) Successfully completing 15 hours of coursework for a specific career pathway.

(2) Successfully completing 15 hours of coursework for a specialized skills career pathway, subsequently beginning work for a recipient who needs that type of specialized care, and providing 40 authorized hours of care to one or more recipients in the first month of service.

(3) Successfully completing 15 hours of coursework for a specialized skills career pathway, subsequently beginning work for a recipient who needs that type of specialized care, and providing 40 authorized hours of care to one or more recipients per month for at least six months.

(g) A qualified third-party entity that has entered into an agreement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b) shall inform providers of the availability of career
 pathways training described in this section. The qualified third-party entity or entities, pursuant to the aforementioned agreement or agreements, shall assist interested providers in registering for offered courses for desired career pathways identified by the provider and track the successful completion of the coursework by a provider.

(h) Incentive payments set forth in subdivision (f), when applicable, shall be issued by the department through the Case Management Information and Payrolling System (CMIPS).

(i) The recipient, as the provider’s employer, shall continue to have the right to hire, fire, train, and direct services provided by their provider.

(j) This section shall be implemented as a pilot project no later than September 1, 2022, or as soon as the necessary automation occurs to implement this section.
 Except for subdivision (l) to accommodate the September 30, 2025, reporting deadline, this section shall remain operative until March 31, 2025, or until a later date, subject to an appropriation.

(k) The department shall contract with an entity, separate from the participating qualified third-party entities, to complete an evaluation of the pilot project that shall include all of the following criteria:

(1) The number of new and existing providers who enrolled in courses to pursue a career pathway.

(2) The number of providers that successfully completed a career pathway and identification of the career pathways completed.

(3) Pursuant to provider surveys, focus groups, and interviews, the effectiveness of the training and
 whether the successful completion of a career pathway resulted in a related license or certificate as well as new or retained employment in the home care and health care industries.

(4) The number of providers who were subsequently employed by a recipient with specialized care needs after completing a specialized career pathway and were retained in that employment for a period of at least six months.

(5) The number of providers who were subsequently employed by a recipient with specialized care needs after completing a specialized career pathway and were retained in that employment for a period of at least 12 months.

(6) The incentive payment amount administered to in-home supportive services providers and waiver personal care services providers for each incentive payment category, pursuant to this section.

(l) An interim report containing updated information on the components specified in subdivision (k) shall be submitted to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, by no later than May 1, 2023, with a final report of the evaluation of the pilot project submitted to the Legislature by September 30, 2025.

(m) Agreements entered into pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the Public Contract Code, and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the approval of the Department of General Services.

(n) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar
 instructions.

(o) If funding is provided for purposes of this section pursuant to Section 11.95 of the Budget Act of 2021 (Chapter 69 of the Statutes of 2021), that funding shall only be used to implement the activities set forth in this section for which the State Department of Health Care Services obtains the necessary federal approval for the Career Pathways Program pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 14124.12.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 59.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Inoperative March 31, 2025, or a later date, as prescribed by its own provisions.    Note: Subdivision (l) to remain operative through September 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

12316.9.

(a) The State Department of Social Services may contract for payrolling or related functions, as necessary, including, but not limited to, the deductions from the wages of providers that are authorized by paragraph (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 12301.6 and subdivision (b) of Section 12302.2, subject to the same statutory requirements that apply to the State Controller when making such deductions.

(b) In determining whether to contract, as described in subdivision (a), the department may consider potential alternatives, with the intent of avoiding disruptions of payroll and deductions processes and the operations of the In-Home Supportive Services program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 110, Sec. 7.   (SB 156)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

12317.

(a) The State Department of Social Services shall be responsible for procuring and implementing a new Case Management Information and Payroll System (CMIPS) for the In-Home Supportive Services Program and Personal Care Services Program (IHSS/PCSP). This section shall not be interpreted to transfer any of the IHSS/PCSP policy responsibilities from the State Department of Social Services or the State Department of Health Care Services.

(b) At a minimum, the new system shall
 provide case management, payroll, and management information in order to support the IHSS/PCSP, and shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide current and accurate information in order to manage the IHSS/PCSP caseload.

(2) Calculate accurate wage and benefit deductions.

(3) Provide management information to monitor and evaluate the IHSS/PCSP.

(4) Coordinate benefits information and processing with the California Medicaid Management Information System.

(c) The new system shall be consistent with current state and federal laws, shall incorporate technology that can be readily enhanced and modernized for the expected life of the system, and, to the extent possible, shall employ open
 architectures and standards.

(d) By August 31, 2004, the State Department of Social Services shall begin a fair and open competitive procurement for the new CMIPS. All state agencies shall cooperate with the State Department of Social Services and the California Health and Human Services Agency Data Center to expedite the procurement, design, development, implementation, and operation of the new CMIPS.

(e) The State Department of Social Services, with any necessary assistance from the State Department of Health Care Services, shall seek all federal approvals and waivers necessary to secure federal financial participation and system design approval of the new system.

(f) The new CMIPS shall include features to strengthen fraud prevention and detection, as well as to reduce overpayments. Program requirements shall
 include, but shall not be limited to, the ability to readily identify out-of-state providers, recipient hospital stays that are five days or longer, and excessive hours paid to a single provider, and to match recipient information with death reports. This functionality shall be available by April 1, 2010, and implemented statewide by July 1, 2011.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 759, Sec. 33.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12317.1.

The department may enter into interagency agreements with the State Department of Health Services to administer approved federal waivers authorized pursuant to Section 14132.951 or services provided under Section 14132.95, and to deliver waiver services in the same manner as services delivered pursuant to this article, and as authorized by Section 1396a(a)(11)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code, which provides that California’s state plan for medical assistance under the Medicaid program allows the State Department of Health Services, as the single state
 Medicaid agency, to “enter into cooperative arrangements with the State agencies responsible for administering or supervising the administration of health services and vocational rehabilitation services in the State looking toward maximum utilization of such services in the provision of medical assistance under the plan.” If an interagency agreement is entered into pursuant to this section, it shall come within the provisions of Section 14000.03.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 229, Sec. 53.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12317.2.

(a) Except as set forth in subdivision (b), in the event of a conflict between the terms of the waiver approved pursuant to Section 14132.951 and any provision of this part or any regulation adopted for the purpose of implementing this part, the terms of the waiver shall control to the extent that the services are covered under the waiver. If the department determines that a conflict exists, the department shall issue updated instructions to counties for purposes of implementing necessary program changes. The department shall post a copy of,
 or a link to, the instructions on its Web site.

(b) The authority to waive or modify provisions of this part pursuant to this section does not include the authority to waive or modify the provisions of Section 12301.2, 12301.6, 12302.25, 12306.1, or 12309.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 229, Sec. 54.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12318.

(a) The State Department of Social Services shall, in consultation with interested stakeholders, develop, or otherwise identify, both of the following:

(1) Standard educational material about sexual harassment and the prevention thereof to be made available to providers and recipients of in-home supportive services.

(2) A proposed method for uniform data collection to identify the prevalence of sexual harassment in the In-Home Supportive Services program.

(b) The department shall convene its first meeting with the interested stakeholders no later than February 1, 2019, and shall meet regularly thereafter. 

(c) The department shall, on or before September 30, 2019, provide a copy of the educational material and a description of the proposed method for uniform data collection to the relevant budget and policy committees of the Legislature.

(d) This section does not change the nature of any employment relationship between providers and the county, public authority, nonprofit consortium, or state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 948, Sec. 1.   (AB 3082)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Relatives’ Responsibility [12350. - 12351.]

12350.

No relative shall be held legally liable to support or to contribute to the support of any applicant for or recipient of aid under this chapter. No relative shall be held liable to defray in whole or in part the cost of any medical care or hospital care or other service rendered to the recipient pursuant to any provision of this code if he is an applicant for or a recipient of aid under this chapter at the time such medical care or hospital care or other service is rendered.

Notwithstanding Sections 3910, 4400, and 4401 of the Family Code, or Section 270c of the Penal Code, or any other provision of this code, no demand shall be made upon any relative to support or contribute toward the support of any applicant for or recipient of aid under this chapter. No county or city and county or officer or employee thereof shall threaten any such relative with any legal action against him by or in behalf of the county or city and county or with any penalty whatsoever.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 153.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

12351.

In order to conserve state enforcement funds and because of hardships under past law on the operative date of this act there is hereby released, rescinded, canceled, and otherwise nullified in whole, any sums due or owing and which yet remain unpaid from a responsible relative under Article 3 (commencing with Section 12100) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9 of this code as in effect prior to January 1, 1974, to the state and counties; provided that such responsible relative begins and continues until January 1, 1976, to perform in compliance with the provisions of Article 8 (commencing with Section 12350) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9 of this code as in effect from January 1, 1974, to January 1, 1976, inclusive.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to give to any responsible relative any right whatever to recover from an applicant, recipient, or county or the state any sum already actually and properly paid by the responsible relative prior to January 1, 1974.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 504.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Benefits For California Veterans [12400. - 12400.]

12400.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person receiving benefits under Section 12200 on December 14, 1999, and who meets the requirements of subdivision (b) shall be eligible to receive benefits under this chapter although he or she does not retain a residence in the state and returns to the Republic of the Philippines, if he or she maintains a permanent residence in the Republic of the Philippines without any lapse of his or her presence in the Republic of the Philippines for a period of more than 30 consecutive days in any period of 12 months and without a lapse of his or her presence in the Republic of the Philippines for two periods of 30 consecutive days during a period of three years.

(b) A person subject to subdivision (a) shall be eligible to receive benefits pursuant to this chapter if he or she was receiving benefits pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d) of Section 12200 on December 14, 1999, and meets both the following requirements:

(1) He or she is a veteran of World War II.

(2) He or she was a member of the Government of the Commonwealth of the Philippines military forces who was in the service of the United States on July 31, 1941, or thereafter.

(c) Benefits under this chapter shall be calculated the same as those benefits paid under subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d) of Section 12200, as appropriate.

(d) Benefits paid under this chapter shall be in lieu of benefits paid under Section 12200 or any other provision of Article 1 (commencing with Section 12000) of Chapter 3 for the period for which the benefits are paid.

(e) Benefits shall be paid under this chapter for any period during which the recipient is eligible to receive benefits under Title 8 of the federal Social Security Act as a result of the application of federal Public Law 106-169, subject to any limitations imposed by this section.

(f) This section shall apply only to any individual who returns to the Republic of the Philippines for the period during which the individual establishes and maintains a residence in the Republic of the Philippines and shall cease to apply to any individual who, after receiving benefits pursuant to this section, leaves the Republic of the Philippines and establishes a residence outside the Republic of the Philippines.

(g) To assist the state in administering this chapter, the Secretary of the California Health and Human Services Agency shall seek an agreement with the federal government to administer this chapter in conjunction with benefits under Title 8 of the federal Social Security Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 143, Sec. 3.   Effective July 19, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Emergency Payments and Special Circumstances for Aged, Blind and Disabled [12500. - 12601.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [12500. - 12502.]

12500.

(a) The purpose of this chapter is to provide payment to meet the needs of recipients under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000), under emergency or special circumstances in the event that the federal government makes no provision for that category payment or in the event that the payment from the federal government program is lost, stolen, or likely to be delayed beyond four days.

(b) The payments provided for under this chapter are also available to the recipients of programs provided for under Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 and Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 18937) of Part 6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 111, Sec. 38.   Effective July 30, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12501.

(a) To the extent permitted by federal law, payments made pursuant to this chapter for special circumstances shall be excluded in determining the income of an individual for the purposes of the federal supplemental security income program and the state supplementary payment program administered by the Commissioner of Social Security and shall be considered as assistance based on need and furnished by the state as described in Section 1616(a) of Title XVI of the Social Security Act.

(b) Payments made pursuant to this chapter for special circumstances shall be excluded in determining the income of an applicant for or recipient of benefits under the program provided for under Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 and Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 18937) of Part 6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 111, Sec. 39.   Effective July 30, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12502.

There shall not be additional income and resource limits for the program provided for under this chapter other than those applicable to the categorical program mentioned in Section 12500 that provides eligibility for the program provided for in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 111, Sec. 39.5.   Effective July 30, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Special Circumstances [12550. - 12554.]

12550.

(a) For the purposes of this article, “special circumstances” means those which are not common to all recipients and which arise out of need for certain goods or services, and physical infirmities or other conditions peculiar, on a nonrecurring basis, to the individual’s situation. Special circumstances shall include purchase, repair, and replacement of essential household furniture, equipment, or clothing, necessary moving expenses, required housing repairs, and unmet shelter needs, subject to limits set by the department.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 111, Sec. 40.   Effective July 30, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12550.1.

(a) Effective July 1, 2001, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following benefits shall be provided under this article:

(1) The maximum amount for purchase, repair, or modification of housing or to prevent foreclosures or for relocation expenses shall be one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(2) The maximum amount of payment for the purchase, repair or replacement of equipment, including appliances, shall be six hundred dollars ($600).

(3) The maximum amount of payment for the purchase, repair, or replacement of bedding and mattresses shall be three hundred dollars ($300).

(4) The maximum amount of payment for the purchase, repair, or replacement of clothing shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(b) The department may adopt emergency regulations to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 111, Sec. 41.   Effective July 30, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12551.

Special circumstances shall also include special needs as provided in Sections 11023 and 11023.1.

This section shall become operative on July 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 606, Sec. 30.   Effective October 3, 1997.   Note: This section was inoperative from October 3, 1997, until July 1, 1998, pursuant to provisions from this amendment (by Stats. 1997, Ch. 606).)
-------------------------------------------

12552.

The county shall verify that a special circumstance does exist and shall issue a warrant for payment within the guidelines provided by the department. The county shall then send a claim to the state for payment.

This section shall become operative on July 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 606, Sec. 31.   Effective October 3, 1997.   Note: This section was inoperative from October 3, 1997, until July 1, 1998, pursuant to provisions from this amendment (by Stats. 1997, Ch. 606).)
-------------------------------------------

12552.1.

(a) A county may transfer funds received for the implementation of this chapter from its administrative allocation to its benefit allocation for the purposes of providing additional benefits to clients to the extent that administrative savings are achieved.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2001.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 111, Sec. 42.   Effective July 30, 2001.   Applicable from July 1, 2001, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12553.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 12552, special circumstances shall also include the administration and payment by the department pursuant to this section of a recurring special need allowance to every eligible recipient who has a guide dog, signal dog, or other service dog, to pay for dog food and other costs associated with the dog’s care and maintenance.

(b) Beginning January 1, 1991, the special need allowance shall be forty dollars ($40) per month. Beginning July 1, 1991, this amount shall be increased to fifty dollars ($50) per month.

(c) The department shall mail an application for the allowance to each eligible recipient. The application shall be upon a standard form prescribed by regulations of the department and containing a written declaration that the affirmation is made under penalty of perjury subject to prosecution as the crime of perjury under the Penal Code. The recipient or, if the recipient is incapable, another person as described in Section 11054 may make the affirmation. The department shall grant the special need allowance upon the basis of the affirmation by mailing a monthly warrant in the amount indicated in subdivision (b) to the recipient.

(d) The county welfare department shall cooperate in assisting the recipient in completing his or her application for the special need allowance authorized by this section.

(e) For purposes of this section, “eligible recipient” means any blind or disabled recipient of either or both of the following benefits:

(1) Federal supplemental security income benefits provided pursuant to Subchapter 16 (commencing with Section 1381) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) Benefits provided under the State Supplementary Program pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 871, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12554.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 12552, special circumstances shall also include the administration and payment by the department pursuant to this section of a recurring special need allowance to every eligible recipient who has a guide dog, signal dog, or other service dog, to pay for dog food and other costs associated with the dog’s care and maintenance.

(b) For purposes of this section, the special need allowance shall be fifty dollars ($50) per month.

(c) The department shall mail an application for the allowance to each recipient of benefits under the federal Social Security Disability Insurance (SSDI) program who is known to the department to have a guide dog, signal dog, or other service dog, or who has requested an application from the department, and who is a legal resident of this state. The application shall include a disclosure of the applicant’s resources and all sources and amounts of the applicant’s income. The application shall be upon a standard form prescribed by regulations of the department and containing a written declaration that the affirmation is made under penalty of perjury subject to prosecution as the crime of perjury under the Penal Code. The recipient or, if the recipient is incapable, another person as described in Section 11054 may make the affirmation. In order to establish eligibility pursuant to subdivision (e), the applicant shall also be required to present a proof of income statement from the federal Social Security Administration. The department shall grant the special need allowance upon the basis of the affirmation by mailing a monthly warrant in the amount indicated in subdivision (b) to the recipient.

(d) The county welfare department shall cooperate in assisting the recipient in completing his or her application for the special need allowance authorized by this section.
